Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.14
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; stop-sale, stop-use, or removal order; effect; release, when.

The director may issue and enforce a written or printed stop-sale, stop-use, or removal order to the owner or custodian of any lot of commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance and may require the owner or custodian to hold any lot at a designated place when the director has reason to believe the product is being offered or exposed for sale in violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act until the law has been complied with and such product is released in writing by the director or the violation has been otherwise legally disposed of by written authority. The director shall release the product so withdrawn when the requirements of the act have been complied with and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the withdrawal have been paid.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 14, p. 1044;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 871, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 22.
March 17, 2026